Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.050

Contact with proprietors—Requirements—Prohibited acts.

(1) Before seeking payment or a contract for payment of royalties for the use of copyrighted works by that proprietor, a representative or agent for a performing rights society must: Identify himself or herself to the proprietor or the proprietor's employees, disclose that he or she is acting on behalf of a performing rights society, and disclose the purpose for being on the premises.

(2) A representative or agent of a performing rights society must not:

(a) Use obscene, abusive, or profane language when communicating with the proprietor or his or her employees;

(b) Communicate by telephone or in-person with a proprietor other than at the proprietor's place of business during the hours when the proprietor's business is open to the public. However, such communications may occur at a location other than the proprietor's place of business or during hours when the proprietor's business is not open to the public if the proprietor or the proprietor's agents, employees, or representatives so authorizes;

(c) Engage in any coercive conduct, act, or practice that is substantially disruptive to a proprietor's business;

(d) Use or attempt to use any unfair or deceptive act or practice in negotiating with a proprietor; or

(e) Communicate with an unlicensed proprietor about licensing performances of musical works at the proprietor's establishment after receiving notification in writing from an attorney representing the proprietor that all further communications related to the licensing of the proprietor's establishment by the performing rights society should be addressed to the attorney. However, the performing rights society may resume communicating directly with the proprietor if the attorney fails to respond to communications from the performing rights society within sixty days, or the attorney becomes nonresponsive for a period of sixty days or more.

[ 2016 c 38 s 5.]